Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1207
Early voting; authorized.

(1) A program participant who is otherwise qualified to vote may apply to vote early under sections 32-938 to 32-951. The county clerk or election commissioner shall transmit the ballot for early voting to the program participant at the address designated by the program participant in his or her application as an early voter. Neither the name nor the address of a program participant or a registered voter with a court order issued as described under section 32-331 shall be included in any list of registered voters available to the public.

(2) The county clerk or election commissioner shall not make a program participant's address contained in voter registration records available for public inspection or copying except under the following circumstances:

(a) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement agency; or

(b) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the order.

Laws 2003, LB 228, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 33;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 50.